California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
The court may not correct an award unless:

(a) A petition or response requesting that the award be corrected has been duly served and filed; or

(b) A petition or response requesting that the award be vacated has been duly served and filed and:

(1) All petitioners and respondents are before the court; or

(2) All petitioners and respondents have been given reasonable notice that the court will be requested at the
hearing to correct the award or that the court on its own motion has determined to correct the award and all petitioners and respondents have been given an opportunity to show why the award should not be corrected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1287.

If the award is vacated, the court may order a rehearing before new arbitrators. If the award is vacated on the grounds set forth in paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 1286.2, the court with the consent of the parties to the court proceeding may order a rehearing before the original arbitrators.

If the arbitration agreement requires that the award be made within a
specified period of time, the rehearing may nevertheless be held and the award made within an equal period of time beginning with the date of the order for rehearing but only if the court determines that the purpose of the time limit agreed upon by the parties to the arbitration agreement will not be frustrated by the application of this provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 15.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1287.2.

The court shall dismiss the proceeding under this chapter as to any person named as a respondent if the court determines that such person was not bound by the arbitration award and was not a party to the arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1287.4.

If an award is confirmed, judgment shall be entered in conformity therewith. The judgment so entered has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action of the same jurisdictional classification; and it may be enforced like any other judgment of the court in which it is entered, in an action of the same jurisdictional classification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 124.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1287.6.

An award that has not been confirmed or vacated has the same force and effect as a contract in writing between the parties to the arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Limitations of Time [1288. - 1288.8.]

1288.

A petition to confirm an award shall be served and filed not later than four years after the date of service of a signed copy of the award on the petitioner. A petition to vacate an award or to correct an award shall be served and filed not later than 100 days after the date of the service of a signed copy of the award on the petitioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.2.

A response requesting that an award be vacated or that an award be corrected shall be served and filed not later than 100 days after the date of service of a signed copy of the award upon:

(a) The respondent if he was a party to the arbitration; or

(b) The respondent’s representative if the respondent was not a party to the arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.4.

No petition may be served and filed under this chapter until at least 10 days after service of the signed copy of the award upon the petitioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.6.

If an application is made to the arbitrators for correction of the award, a petition may not be served and filed under this chapter until the determination of that application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.8.

If an application is made to the arbitrators for correction of the award, the date of the service of the award for the purposes of this article shall be deemed to be whichever of the following dates is the earlier:

(a) The date of service upon the petitioner of a signed copy of the correction of the award or of the denial of the application.

(b) The date that such application is deemed to be denied under Section 1284.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. General Provisions Relating toJudicial Proceedings [1290. - 1294.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petitions and Responses [1290. - 1291.2.]

1290.

A proceeding under this title in the courts of this State is commenced by filing a petition. Any person named as a respondent in a petition may file a response thereto. The allegations of a petition are deemed to be admitted by a respondent duly served therewith unless a response is duly served and filed. The allegations of a response are deemed controverted or avoided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1290.2.

A petition under this title shall be heard in a summary way in the manner and upon the notice provided by law for the making and hearing of motions, except that not less than 10 days’ notice of the date set for the hearing on the petition shall be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1290.4.

(a) A copy of the petition and a written notice of the time and place of the hearing thereof and any other papers upon which the petition is based shall be served in the manner provided in the arbitration agreement for the service of such petition and notice.

(b) If the arbitration agreement does not provide the manner in which such service shall be made and the person upon whom service is to be made has not previously appeared in the proceeding and has not previously been served in accordance with this subdivision:

(1) Service within this State shall be made in the manner provided by law for the service of summons in an action.

(2) Service outside this State shall be made by mailing the copy of the petition and notice and other papers by registered or certified mail. Personal service is the equivalent of such service by mail. Proof of service by mail shall be made by affidavit showing such mailing together with the return receipt of the United States Post Office bearing the signature of the person on whom service was made. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, if service is made in the manner provided in this paragraph, the petition may not be heard until at least 30 days after the date of such service.

(c) If the arbitration agreement does not provide the manner in which such service shall be made and the person on whom service is to be made has previously appeared
in the proceeding or has previously been served in accordance with subdivision (b) of this section, service shall be made in the manner provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1290.6.

A response shall be served and filed within 10 days after service of the petition except that if the petition is served in the manner provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1290.4, the response shall be served and filed within 30 days after service of the petition. The time provided in this section for serving and filing a response may be extended by an agreement in writing between the parties to the court proceeding or, for good cause, by order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1290.8.

A response shall be served as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1291.

A statement of decision shall be made by the court, if requested pursuant to Section 632, whenever an order or judgment, except a special order after final judgment, is made that is appealable under this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 302, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1291.2.

In all proceedings brought under the provisions of this title, all courts wherein such proceedings are pending shall give such proceedings preference over all other civil actions or proceedings, except older matters of the same character and matters to which special precedence may be given by law, in the matter of setting the same for hearing and in hearing the same to the end that all such proceedings shall be quickly heard and determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Venue, Jurisdiction and Costs [1292. - 1293.2.]

1292.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any petition made prior to the commencement of arbitration shall be filed in a court having jurisdiction in:

(a) The county where the agreement is to be performed or was made.

(b) If the agreement does not specify a county where the agreement is to be performed and the agreement was not made in any county in this state, the county where any party to the court proceeding resides or has a
place of business.

(c) In any case not covered by subdivision (a) or (b) of this section, in any county in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1292.2.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any petition made after the commencement or completion of arbitration shall be filed in a court having jurisdiction in the county where the arbitration is being or has been held, or, if not held exclusively in any one county of this state, or if held outside of this state, then the petition shall be filed as provided in Section 1292.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1292.4.

If a controversy referable to arbitration under an alleged agreement is involved in an action or proceeding pending in a superior court, a petition for an order to arbitrate shall be filed in such action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1292.6.

After a petition has been filed under this title, the court in which such petition was filed retains jurisdiction to determine any subsequent petition involving the same agreement to arbitrate and the same controversy, and any such subsequent petition shall be filed in the same proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1292.8.

A motion for a stay of an action on the ground that an issue therein is subject to arbitration shall be made in the court where the action is pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1293.

The making of an agreement in this State providing for arbitration to be had within this State shall be deemed a consent of the parties thereto to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State to enforce such agreement by the making of any orders provided for in this title and by entering of judgment on an award under the agreement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1293.2.

The court shall award costs upon any judicial proceeding under this title as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1021) of Title 14 of Part 2 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Appeals [1294. - 1294.4.]

1294.

An aggrieved party may appeal from:

(a) An order dismissing or denying a petition to compel arbitration. Notwithstanding Section 916, the perfecting of such an appeal shall not automatically stay any proceedings in the trial court during the pendency of the appeal.

(b) An order dismissing a petition to confirm, correct or vacate an award.

(c) An order vacating an award unless a rehearing in arbitration is ordered.

(d) A judgment entered pursuant to this title.

(e) A special order after final judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 710, Sec. 1.   (SB 365)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1294.2.

The appeal shall be taken in the same manner as an appeal from an order or judgment in a civil action. Upon an appeal from any order or judgment under this title, the court may review the decision and any intermediate ruling, proceeding, order or decision which involves the merits or necessarily affects the order or judgment appealed from, or which substantially affects the rights of a party. The court may also on such appeal review any order on motion for a new trial. The respondent on the appeal, or party in whose favor the judgment or order was given may, without appealing from such judgment, request the court to and it may review any of the foregoing matters for the
purpose of determining whether or not the appellant was prejudiced by the error or errors upon which he relies for reversal or modification of the judgment or order from which the appeal is taken. The provisions of this section do not authorize the court to review any decision or order from which an appeal might have been taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

1294.4.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in an appeal filed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1294 involving a claim under the Elder and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) in which a party has been granted a preference pursuant to Section 36 of this code, the court of appeal shall issue its decision no later than 100 days after the notice of appeal
is filed.

(b) The court of appeal may grant an extension of time in the appeal only if good cause is shown and the extension will promote the interests of justice.

(c) The Judicial Council shall, on or before July 1, 2017, adopt rules of court to do both of the following:

(1) Implement subdivisions (a) and (b).

(2) Establish a shortened notice of appeal period for the cases described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 628, Sec. 2.   (SB 1065)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9.1. ARBITRATION OF MEDICAL MALPRACTICE [1295. - 1295.]

1295.

(a) Any contract for medical services which contains a provision for arbitration of any dispute as to professional negligence of a health care provider shall have such provision as the first article of the contract and shall be expressed in the following language: “It is understood that any dispute as to medical malpractice, that is as to whether any medical services rendered under this contract were unnecessary or unauthorized or were improperly, negligently or incompetently rendered, will be determined by submission to arbitration as provided by California law, and not by a lawsuit or resort to court process except as California law provides for judicial review of arbitration proceedings. Both parties to this contract, by entering into it, are giving up their constitutional right to
 have any such dispute decided in a court of law before a jury, and instead are accepting the use of arbitration.”

(b) Immediately before the signature line provided for the individual contracting for the medical services must appear the following in at least 10-point bold red type:

“NOTICE: BY SIGNING THIS CONTRACT YOU ARE AGREEING TO HAVE ANY ISSUE OF MEDICAL MALPRACTICE DECIDED BY NEUTRAL ARBITRATION AND YOU ARE GIVING UP YOUR RIGHT TO A JURY OR COURT TRIAL. SEE ARTICLE 1 OF THIS CONTRACT.”

(c) Once signed, such a contract governs all subsequent open-book account transactions for medical services for which the contract was signed until or unless rescinded by written notice within 30 days of signature. Written notice of such rescission may be given by a guardian or conservator of the patient if the patient is incapacitated or a
 minor.

(d) Where the contract is one for medical services to a minor, it shall not be subject to disaffirmance if signed by the minor’s parent or legal guardian.

(e) Such a contract is not a contract of adhesion, nor unconscionable nor otherwise improper, where it complies with subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of this section.

(f) Subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall not apply to any health care service plan contract offered by an organization registered pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 12530) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, which contains an arbitration agreement if the plan complies with paragraph (10) of subdivision
 (b) of Section 1363 of the Health and Safety Code, or otherwise has a procedure for notifying prospective subscribers of the fact that the plan has an arbitration provision, and the plan contracts conform to subdivision (h) of Section 1373 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Health care provider” means any person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code; and any clinic, health dispensary, or health facility, licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code. “Health care provider” includes
 the legal representatives of a health care provider;

(2) “Professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission to act by a health care provider in the rendering of professional services, which act or omission is the proximate cause of a personal injury or wrongful death, provided that such services are within the scope of services for which the provider is licensed and which are not within any restriction imposed by the licensing agency or licensed hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 1.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9.2. PUBLIC CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT ARBITRATION [1296. - 1296.]

1296.

The parties to a construction contract with a public agency may expressly agree in writing that in any arbitration to resolve a dispute relating to the contract, the arbitrator’s award shall be supported by law and substantial evidence. If the agreement so provides, a court shall, subject to Section 1286.4, vacate the award if after review of the award it determines either that the award is not supported by substantial evidence or that it is based on an error of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 46.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9.3. ARBITRATION AND CONCILIATION OF INTERNATIONAL COMMERCIAL DISPUTES [1297.11. - 1297.432.]



  CHAPTER 1. Application and Interpretation [1297.11. - 1297.61.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope of Application [1297.11. - 1297.17.]

1297.11.

This title applies to international commercial arbitration and conciliation, subject to any agreement which is in force between the United States and any other state or states.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.12.

This title, except Article 2 (commencing with Section 1297.81) of Chapter 2 and Article 3 (commencing with Section 1297.90) of Chapter 2, applies only if the place of arbitration or conciliation is in the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 1.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.13.

An arbitration or conciliation agreement is international if any of the following applies:

(a) The parties to an arbitration or conciliation agreement have, at the time of the conclusion of that agreement, their places of business in different states.

(b) One of the following places is situated outside the state in which the parties have their places of business:

(i) The place of arbitration or conciliation if determined in, or
pursuant to, the arbitration or conciliation agreement.

(ii) Any place where a substantial part of the obligations of the commercial relationship is to be performed.

(iii) The place with which the subject matter of the dispute is most closely connected.

(c) The parties have expressly agreed that the subject matter of the arbitration or conciliation agreement relates to commercial interests in more than one state.

(d) The subject matter of the arbitration or conciliation agreement is otherwise related to commercial interests in more than one state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.14.

For the purposes of Section 1297.13, if a party has more than one place of business, the place of business is that which has the closest relationship to the arbitration agreement, and if a party does not have a place of business, reference is to be made to his habitual residence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.15.

For the purposes of Section 1297.13, the states of the United States, including the District of Columbia, shall be considered one state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.16.

An arbitration or conciliation agreement is commercial if it arises out of a relationship of a commercial nature including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(a) A transaction for the supply or exchange of goods or services.

(b) A distribution agreement.

(c) A commercial representation or agency.

(d) An exploitation agreement or concession.

(e) A joint venture or other, related form of industrial or business cooperation.

(f) The carriage of goods or passengers by air, sea, rail, or road.

(g) Construction.

(h) Insurance.

(i) Licensing.

(j) Factoring.

(k) Leasing.

(l) Consulting.

(m) Engineering.

(n) Financing.

(o) Banking.

(p) The transfer of data or technology.

(q) Intellectual or industrial property, including trademarks, patents, copyrights and software programs.

(r) Professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.17.

This title shall not affect any other law in force in California by virtue of which certain disputes may not be submitted to arbitration or may be submitted to arbitration only in accordance with provisions other than those of this title. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this title supersedes Sections 1280 to 1284.2, inclusive, with respect to international commercial arbitration and conciliation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Interpretation [1297.20. - 1297.24.]

1297.20.

(a) In the application of this title, regard is to be had to its international origin and to the need to promote uniformity in its application and the observance of good faith.

(b) Questions concerning matters governed by this title that are not expressly settled in it are to be settled in conformity with the general principles embodied in this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 2.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.21.

For the purposes of this title:

(a) “Arbitral award” means any decision of the arbitral tribunal on the substance of the dispute submitted to it and includes an interim, interlocutory, or partial arbitral award.

(b) “Arbitral tribunal” means a sole arbitrator or a panel of arbitrators. 

(c) “Arbitration” means any arbitration whether or not administered by a permanent arbitral institution.

(d) “Conciliation” means any conciliation whether or not administered by a permanent conciliation institution.

(e) “Chief Justice” means the Chief Justice of California or his or her designee.

(f) “Court” means a body or an organ of the judicial system of a state.

(g) “Party” means a party to an arbitration or conciliation agreement.

(h) “Superior court” means the superior court in the county in this state selected pursuant to Section 1297.61.

(i) “Supreme Court” means the Supreme Court of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.22.

Where a provision of this title, except Article 1 (commencing with Section 1297.281) of Chapter 6, leaves the parties free to determine a certain issue, such freedom includes the right of the parties to authorize a third party, including an institution, to make that determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.23.

Where a provision of this title refers to the fact that the parties have agreed or that they may agree, or in any other way refers to an agreement of the parties, such agreement shall be deemed to include any arbitration or conciliation rules referred to in that agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.24.

Where this title, other than Article 8 (commencing with Section 1297. 251) of Chapter 5, Article 5 (commencing with Section 1297.321) of Chapter 6, or subdivision (a) of Section 1297.322, refers to a claim, it also applies to a counterclaim, and where it refers to a defense, it also applies to a defense to that counterclaim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Receipt of Written Communications [1297.31. - 1297.33.]

1297.31.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, any written communication is deemed to have been received if it is delivered to the addressee personally or if it is delivered at his place of business, habitual residence, or mailing address, and the communication is deemed to have been received on the day it is so delivered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.32.

If none of the places referred to in Section 1297.31 can be found after making a reasonable inquiry, a written communication is deemed to have been received if it is sent to the addressee’s last known place of business, habitual residence, or mailing address by registered mail or by any other means which provides a record of the attempt to deliver it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.33.

This article does not apply to written communications in respect of court proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Waiver of Right to Object [1297.41. - 1297.42.]

1297.41.

A party who knows that any provision of this title, or any requirement under the arbitration agreement, has not been complied with and yet proceeds with the arbitration without stating his or her objection to noncompliance without undue delay or, if a time limit is provided for stating that objection, within that period of time, shall be deemed to have waived his right to object.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.42.

For purposes of Section 1297.41, “any provision of this title” means any provision of this title in respect of which the parties may otherwise agree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Extent of Judicial Intervention [1297.51. - 1297.51.]

1297.51.

In matters governed by this title, no court shall intervene except where so provided in this title, or applicable federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Functions [1297.61. - 1297.61.]

1297.61.

The functions referred to in Sections 1297.114, 1297.115, 1297.116, 1297.134, 1297.135, 1297.136, 1297.165, 1297.166, and 1297.167 shall be performed by the superior court of the county in which the place of arbitration is located. The functions referred to in Section 1297.81 shall be performed by the superior court selected pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1292) of Chapter 5 of Title 9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Arbitration Agreements and Judicial Measures in Aid of Arbitration [1297.71. - 1297.95.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definition and Form of Arbitration Agreements [1297.71. - 1297.73.]

1297.71.

An “arbitration agreement” is an agreement by the parties to submit to arbitration all or certain disputes which have arisen or which may arise between them in respect of a defined legal relationship, whether contractual or not. An arbitration agreement may be in the form of an arbitration clause in a contract or in the form of a separate agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.72.

An arbitration agreement shall be in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 3.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.73.

(a) An arbitration agreement is in writing if its content is recorded in any form, including, but not limited to, in a document signed by the parties or in an exchange of letters, telex, telegrams, electronic mail, or other means of telecommunication accessible for subsequent reference that provides a record of the agreement.

(b) The requirement that an arbitration agreement be in writing is met by an electronic communication if the information contained therein is accessible so as to be usable for subsequent reference.

(1) “Electronic communication” means any communication that the parties make by means of data messages.

(2) “Data message” means information generated, sent, received, or stored by electronic, magnetic, optical, or similar means, including, but not limited to, electronic data interchange (EDI), electronic mail, telegram, telex, or telecopy.

(c) An arbitration agreement is in writing if it is contained in an exchange of statements of claim and defense in which the existence of an agreement is alleged by one party and not denied by the other.

(d) The reference in a contract to any document containing an arbitration clause constitutes an arbitration agreement in writing, provided that the reference is such as to make that clause part of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 4.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Stay of Proceedings [1297.81. - 1297.82.]

1297.81.

When a party to an international commercial arbitration agreement as defined in this title commences judicial proceedings seeking relief with respect to a matter covered by the agreement to arbitrate, any other party to the agreement may apply to the superior court for an order to stay the proceedings and to compel arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.82.

A timely request for a stay of judicial proceedings made under Section 1297.81 shall be granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Court-Ordered Interim Measures [1297.90. - 1297.95.]

1297.90.

It is not incompatible with an arbitration agreement for a party to request from a superior court, before or during arbitral proceedings, an interim measure of protection, or for the court to grant such a measure.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1297.91 by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 6.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.91.

A superior court shall have the same power to issue an interim measure of protection in relation to arbitration proceedings, irrespective of whether the place of arbitration is in California, as it has in relation to proceedings filed in the first instance in the superior courts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 7.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.92.

Any party to an arbitration governed by this title may request the superior court to enforce an interim measure of protection granted by an arbitral tribunal pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1297.171) of Chapter 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 90, Sec. 8.   (AB 1903)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.93.

Measures which the court may grant in connection with a pending arbitration include, but are not limited to:

(a) An order of attachment issued to assure that the award to which applicant may be entitled is not rendered ineffectual by the dissipation of party assets. 

(b) A preliminary injunction granted in order to protect trade secrets or to conserve goods which are the subject matter of the arbitral dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.94.

In considering a request for interim relief, the court shall give preclusive effect to any and all findings of fact of the arbitral tribunal including the probable validity of the claim which is the subject of the award for interim relief and which the arbitral tribunal has previously granted in the proceeding in question, provided that such interim award is consistent with public policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.95.

Where the arbitral tribunal has not ruled on an objection to its jurisdiction, the court shall not grant preclusive effect to the tribunal’s findings until the court has made an independent finding as to the jurisdiction of the arbitral tribunal. If the court rules that the arbitral tribunal did not have jurisdiction, the application for interim measures of relief shall be denied. Such a ruling by the court that the arbitral tribunal lacks jurisdiction is not binding on the arbitral tribunal or subsequent judicial proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Composition of Arbitral Tribunals [1297.101. - 1297.154.]



  ARTICLE 1. Number of Arbitrators [1297.101. - 1297.101.]

1297.101.

The parties may agree on the number of arbitrators. Otherwise, there shall be one arbitrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointment of Arbitrators [1297.111. - 1297.119.]

1297.111.

A person of any nationality may be an arbitrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.112.

Subject to Sections 1297.115 and 1297.116, the parties may agree on a procedure for appointing the arbitral tribunal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.113.

Failing such agreement referred to in Section 1297.112, in an arbitration with three arbitrators and two parties, each party shall appoint one arbitrator, and the two appointed arbitrators shall appoint the third arbitrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.114.

If the appointment procedure in Section 1297.113 applies and either a party fails to appoint an arbitrator within 30 days after receipt of a request to do so from the other party, or the two appointed arbitrators fail to agree on the third arbitrator within 30 days after their appointment, the appointment shall be made, upon request of a party, by the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.115.

Failing any agreement referred to in Section 1297.112, in an arbitration with a sole arbitrator, if the parties fail to agree on the arbitrator, the appointment shall be made, upon request of a party, by the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.116.

The superior court, upon the request of a party, may take the necessary measures, unless the agreement on the appointment procedure provides other means for securing the appointment, where, under an appointment procedure agreed upon by the parties, any of the following occurs:

(a) A party fails to act as required under that procedure.

(b) The parties, or two appointed arbitrators, fail to reach an agreement expected of them under that procedure.

(c) A third party, including an institution, fails to perform any function entrusted to it under that procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.117.

A decision on a matter entrusted to the superior court pursuant to Sections 1297.114, 127.115, and 1297.116 is final and is not subject to appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.118.

The superior court, in appointing an arbitrator, shall have due regard to all of the following:

(a) Any qualifications required of the arbitrator by the agreement of the parties.

(b) Other considerations as are likely to secure the appointment of an independent and impartial arbitrator.

(c) In the case of a sole or third arbitrator, the advisability of appointing an arbitrator of a nationality other than those of the
parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.119.

An arbitrator has the immunity of a judicial officer from civil liability when acting in the capacity of arbitrator under any statute or contract.

The immunity afforded by this section shall supplement, and not supplant, any otherwise applicable common law or statutory immunity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Grounds for Challenge [1297.121. - 1297.125.]

1297.121.
